Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 3 Grants for Construction and Modernization of Medical Facilities

31-7-50.
Authorization of grants-in-aid.

The state is authorized to make grants to any county, municipality, or any combination thereof or to any hospital authority to assist in the construction and modernization of publicly owned and publicly operated medical facilities, auxiliary medical facilities, and mental health centers as defined in Code Section 31-7-51. The amount of the grant shall be determined in accordance with Code Sections 31-7-52 and 31-7-53.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 263, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 214, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 410, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2101, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 716, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 4-2/HB 252.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

31-7-51.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Auxiliary medical facilities” means diagnostic and treatment facilities, nursing homes, chronic illness hospitals, and rehabilitation centers.

“Construction project” means a program for the construction of any medical facility or auxiliary medical facility or mental health center, as evidenced by the approval of a project under Title VI or Title VII of the federal Public Health Service Act, as now or hereafter amended.

“Hospital authority” means any hospital authority created under the “Hospital Authorities Law,” Article 4 of this chapter, as now or hereafter amended.

“Medical facilities” means general hospitals, psychiatric hospitals, nurse training facilities, tuberculosis hospitals, and public health centers.

“Mental health center” means a facility providing services for the prevention or diagnosis of mental illness, or care and treatment of mentally ill patients, or rehabilitation of such persons, which services are provided principally for persons residing in a particular community or communities in or near which the facility is situated.

Reserved.

“Modernization project” means the alteration, major repair, remodeling, replacement, and renovation of existing buildings (including original equipment thereof) and replacement of obsolete, built-in equipment of existing buildings, as evidenced by the approval of a project under Title VI or Title VII of the federal Public Health Service Act, as now or hereafter amended.

“Publicly operated” means operated by a county, municipality, hospital authority, or any combination thereof.

“Publicly owned” means that a county, municipality, hospital authority, or any combination thereof holds title to or has a long-term lease acceptable to the state agency on the property on which the construction or modernization is proposed.

“State agency” means the State Health Planning and Development Agency or any successor designated as the agency of state government to administer the state construction and modernization plan and receive funds pursuant to Titles VI and VII of the federal Public Health Service Act, as amended.

The terms “hospital,” “psychiatric hospital,” “nurse training facilities,” “public health center,” “rehabilitation facility,” “nursing home,” “chronic illness hospital,” “long-term care facility,” “mental health center,” “construction,” “cost of construction,” “modernization,” and “cost of modernization” shall have meanings consistent with those respectively ascribed to them in Titles VI and VII of the federal Public Health Service Act, as now or hereafter amended.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2102, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 716, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 4-3/HB 252.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

U.S. Code.

Titles VI and VII of the Public Health Service Act, as amended, referred to in this Code section, are codified as

42 U.S.C. § 291

et seq. and

42 U.S.C. § 292

a et seq., respectively.

31-7-52.
Amounts of grants for construction and modernization.

Grants for construction projects or modernization projects made from state appropriations pursuant to this article shall be in an amount equal to one-third of the allowable cost of the project, except as otherwise provided in this article.

In the event that state funds appropriated or otherwise made available during a given fiscal year for construction or modernization are not sufficient to match available federal funds, the state agency shall be empowered to:

Reduce the percentage of contribution by the state below one-third of the allowable cost of the project in order to obtain the optimum amount of construction with funds available; and

At its option, annually establish a ceiling which shall be the maximum amount that can be allotted to each or any medical facility project approved in the given fiscal year, provided that any ceiling so established shall not result in the allotment to a medical facility project of an amount greater than the one-third of allowable cost specified in subsection (a) of this Code section.

The aggregate of federal and state funds granted to publicly owned and publicly operated construction or modernization projects shall be 66 2/3 percent unless state funds are inadequate to obtain optimum construction, in which event the state agency is authorized to establish an aggregate less than 66 2/3 percent.

In the event an aggregate of federal and state funds is established at less than 66 2/3 percent, the state agency is authorized to establish a matching formula for any category of construction which is different from any other matching formula for any other category of construction; the state agency is further authorized to establish a matching formula for any category of modernization which is different from the matching formula for construction projects.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 263, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 214, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 410, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2103, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 716, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 715, §§ 4, 5.

31-7-53.
Matching formula; priority system; use of earnings; approval of federal grant.

The state agency shall establish a matching formula for each construction and modernization category by fiscal year. Any change in a matching formula shall apply in the same manner to each construction and modernization project within the category approved during the fiscal year.

Grants made pursuant to this article shall be in accordance with the priority system as approved by the state agency and the United States secretary of health and human services.

No part of the net earnings of publicly owned and publicly operated medical facilities, auxiliary medical facilities, and mental health centers constructed with the assistance of a grant under this article shall inure to the benefit of any private corporation or individual.

Any grant made pursuant to this article shall be contingent upon the approval for that project of a federal grant approved by the United States secretary of health and human services under either Title VI or Title VII of the federal Public Health Service Act, as now or hereafter amended.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 263, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 214, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 410, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2105, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2104, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 716, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 31; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 4-4/HB 252; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “the federal Public Health Service Act” for “the Public Health Service Act” near the end of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

U.S. Code.

Titles VI and VII of the Public Health Service Act, as amended, referred to in subsection (d), are codified as

42 U.S.C. § 291

et seq. and

42 U.S.C. § 292

a et seq., respectively.

31-7-54.
Manner of expenditure of construction funds.

In order to assist the several counties, municipalities, or any combination thereof or any hospital authorities created under the “Hospital Authorities Law,” Article 4 of this chapter, such funds as are appropriated for each fiscal year for the construction of publicly owned and publicly operated medical facilities, auxiliary medical facilities, and mental health centers shall be expended in accordance with the provisions of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 263, § 2; Ga. L. 1955, p. 410, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-2106, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2105, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 716, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 4-5/HB 252.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”

31-7-55.
Administration of state funds.

The state agency is to be the sole agency for the administration of state funds pursuant to this article. The administration of such funds shall be in direct conjunction with that of federal funds under Titles VI and VII of the Public Health Service Act, as now or hereafter amended.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 263, § 3; Ga. L. 1955, p. 410, § 3; Code 1933, § 88-2107, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2106, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 716, § 1.

U.S. Code.

Titles VI and VII of the Public Health Service Act, as amended, referred to in this Code section, are codified as

42 U.S.C. § 291

et seq. and

42 U.S.C. § 292

a et seq., respectively.

31-7-56.
Adherence to federal law and regulations.

The establishment of hospital service areas, the determination of relative need, the priority of projects, and the standards of construction shall be consistent with Titles VI and VII of the Public Health Service Act, as now or hereafter amended, and the federal regulations prescribed thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 263, § 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 410, § 5; Code 1933, § 88-2108, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2107, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 716, § 1.

U.S. Code.

Titles VI and VII of the Public Health Service Act, as amended, referred to in this Code section, are codified as

42 U.S.C. § 291

et seq. and

42 U.S.C. § 292

a et seq., respectively.

31-7-57.
Procedure for grants to sponsors of construction projects; injunction of operation by transferee in violation of article.

For each construction project, there shall be submitted to the state agency an application for state funds.

Upon approving an application under this Code section, the state agency shall submit a budget request to the Office of Planning and Budget, based upon such application. Approval by the Office of Planning and Budget shall constitute an obligation of the state.

Payments to the sponsor of a construction project shall be made in installments as construction progresses at intervals to be determined at the discretion of the state agency; and the state agency shall have the right to inspect and audit records and accounts of the sponsor as a condition precedent to making payments.

If any publicly owned and publicly operated medical facility, auxiliary medical facility, or mental health center for which funds have been paid under this Code section shall be leased to any corporation, person, organization, or body other than one eligible to receive a grant under this article or shall be sold or used for any purpose contrary to the provision under which the grant was made, at any time within 20 years after completion of construction, and such change in lease, sale, or use is not approved by the state agency, such agency may bring an equitable proceeding for writ of injunction against any person, firm, corporation, or organization operating in violation of this article. The proceedings shall be filed in the county in which such persons reside or, in the case of a firm or corporation, where such firm or corporation maintains its principal office; and, unless it is shown that such person, firm, or corporation which has leased such medical facility, auxiliary medical facility, or mental health center would have been eligible to accept the grant-in-aid from the state in the first instance and the lease has been approved by the state agency or the sale or use has been approved by such agency, the writ of injunction shall issue and such person, firm, or corporation shall be perpetually enjoined throughout the state from operating in violation of the provisions of this subsection. It shall not be necessary in order to obtain the equitable relief provided in this subsection that the state agency show that such person, firm, or corporation is ineligible nor to prove that there is no adequate remedy at law. In addition, the state agency shall be entitled to bring an action and recover from the transferor and transferee of any facility specified in this subsection such percentage of the value of the facility as the state grant bore toward the total construction cost of that facility as determined by agreement of the parties or by action brought in court.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 263, § 7; Ga. L. 1955, p. 410, § 6; Code 1933, § 88-2109, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2108, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 716, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 4-6/HB 252.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”